Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1564.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-420.06, to read: START_STATUTE36-420.06. Electronic monitoring; disclosure; posting; definitions A. On or before December 1, 2026 or on initial licensure, each assisted living facility and nursing care institution shall disclose to the department in a department-APPROVED format whether the assisted living facility or nursing care institution: 1. allows residents to install an electronic monitoring device in the resident's room or personal space. 2. Uses electronic monitoring devices in the common spaces of the assisted living facility or nursing care institution. 3. Uses a technology solution that allows the assisted living facility or nursing care institution to monitor and identify who enters and exits a resident's room and the movement or activity of the person while in the resident's room. B. a licensee for an assisted living facility or nursing care institution shall ensure that the department is notified in a department-approved format of any changes with respect to whether the assisted living facility or nursing care institution allows residents to install an electronic monitoring device in the resident's room or personal space or changes its use of electronic monitoring or a technology solution pursuant to subsection A of this section. C. The DEPARTMENT shall make information it receives pursuant to this section available on the department's public website. D. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Electronic monitoring": (a) Means the use of an electronic monitoring device in the room of a resident of a nursing care institution or assisted living facility to record or transmit sounds or activity to or for the resident, the resident's authorized representative or an authorized third party. (b) Includes the tapes or recordings from the electronic monitoring device. 2. "Electronic monitoring device" means any device or technology that has a placed, fixed or otherwise installed location, that captures, records or broadcasts audio or video, or both, and that is used for electronic monitoring. 3. "Resident" means a person who resides in an assisted living facility or nursing care institution.END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.